District of Columbia statutes.
21-113

Enjoining spouse, parent, or testamentary guardian from interfering with minor’s estate.

On application of a friend of an infant entitled to real or personal estate, or in the exercise of its own discretion, the court may enjoin a parent or spouse or testamentary guardian from interfering with the infant’s estate without being appointed and giving bond as guardian of the estate.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 740, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Oct. 1, 1976, D.C. Law 1-87, § 30(a), 23 DCR 2544
1981 Ed., § 21-113.
1973 Ed., § 21-113.